Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.642.010

Discrimination prohibited—Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1296-S.SL) ***

Discrimination in Washington public schools on the basis of race, creed, religion, color, national origin, honorably discharged veteran or military status, sexual orientation including gender expression or identity, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a person with a disability is prohibited. The definitions given these terms in chapter 49.60 RCW apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

[ 2010 c 240 s 2.]